District of Columbia statutes.
6-641.15

Federal public buildings excepted from this subchapter.

The provisions of this subchapter shall not apply to federal public buildings; provided, however, that, in order to ensure the orderly development of the national capital, the location, height, bulk, number of stories, and size of federal public buildings in the District of Columbia and the provision for open space in and around the same will be subject to the approval of the National Capital Planning Commission.

History

June 20, 1938, 52 Stat. 802, ch. 534, § 16

Cross References

National Capital Planning Commission, proposed developments, projects and acquisitions, see § 2-1004.
Rental and utilization of public space, conditional authorization to construct structures, federal and district governments, see § 10-1121.11.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-1004 and § 10-1121.11.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-432.
1973 Ed., § 5-428.

Transfer of Functions

“National Capital Planning Commission” was substituted for “National Capital Park and Planning Commission” in the proviso in this section in view of the Act of June 6, 1924, ch. 270, § 9, as added by the Act of July 19, 1952, 66 Stat. 790, ch. 949, § 1, which transferred the functions, powers, and duties of the National Capital Park and Planning Commission to the National Capital Planning Commission.

Editor's Notes

This subchapter and subchapter V do not apply to buildings constructed on property transferred or conveyed pursuant to the Act of October 8, 1968, 82 Stat. 958, Pub. L. 90-553, as amended by the Act of May 25, 1982, 96 Stat. 101, Pub. L. 97-186.